kk_KZ/kk_KZ.aff
SFX u N 52
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX u у асындар [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]му
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]су
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX u у йсіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX u у йсыңдар [аоуұыэ]у
SFX u ю йесіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX u ю йасыңдар [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX V N 52
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]му
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]су
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX V у йсіз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX V у йсыз [аоуұыэ]у
SFX V ю йесіз [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX V ю йасыз [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX v N 52
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]му
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]су
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX v у йсіздер [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX v у йсыздар [аоуұыэ]у
SFX v ю йесіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX v ю йасыздар [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX W N 52
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]му
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]су
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX W у йді [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX W у йды [аоуұыэ]у
SFX W ю йеді [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX W ю йады [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX w N 52
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]му
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]су
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX w у йін [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX w у йын [аоуұыэ]у
SFX w ю йеін [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX w ю йаын [аоуұыэ]ю
